Utah statutes.
19-6-402.5.   Retroactive effect.

(1)  The Legislature finds the definitions in this part prior to the passage of this act did not clearly set forth procedures for identifying responsible parties and interfered with effective allocation of costs of cleanup as required by this part.

(2)  It is the intent of the Legislature that this act provides clarification regarding procedures for allocating responsibility for the costs of investigation, abatement, and corrective action as required under this part.

(3)  It is the intent of the Legislature that this part imposes liability as determined under this part retroactively to any release of petroleum or any other regulated substance subject to investigation, abatement, or corrective action under this part.



Enacted by Chapter 214, 1992 General Session

